Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB327.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2168 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:SECTION 1. THE DEFINITION OF "CAMPUS POLICE" IN SECTION 2001-A OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, AMENDED JULY 17, 2024 (P.L.945, NO.89), IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2001-A. DEFINITIONS.--THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ARTICLE SHALL, FOR THE PURPOSE OF THIS ARTICLE, HAVE THE FOLLOWING MEANINGS, RESPECTIVELY, EXCEPT IN <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021 THOSE INSTANCES WHERE THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES A DIFFERENT MEANING:* * *"CAMPUS POLICE" SHALL MEAN ALL LAW ENFORCEMENT PERSONNEL EMPLOYED BY THE SYSTEM WHO [HAVE SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED A CAMPUS POLICE COURSE OF TRAINING APPROVED] ARE CERTIFIED AS POLICE OFFICERS UNDER 53 PA.C.S. CH. 21 SUBCH. D (RELATING TO MUNICIPAL POLICE EDUCATION AND TRAINING).* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 2009-A(A)(13) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 2009-A. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COUNCILS OF TRUSTEES.--(A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH POLICIES, PROCEDURES AND STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD, THE COUNCIL OF EACH INSTITUTION SHALL HAVE THE POWER AND ITS DUTY SHALL BE:* * *[(13) BY RESOLUTION ADOPTED BY THE COUNCIL TO AUTHORIZE CAMPUS POLICE WHO HAVE COMPLETED FIREARMS TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH 53 PA.C.S. § 2167(A) (RELATING TO POLICE TRAINING) TO CARRY FIREARMS IN THE COURSE OF DUTY FOR ANY INSTITUTION WHOSE CAMPUS POLICE ARE AUTHORIZED TO CARRY FIREARMS ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE AUTHORITY TO CARRY FIREARMS SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT UNLESS THE COUNCIL BY RESOLUTION DISSOLVES SUCH AUTHORITY.]* * *SECTION 3. SECTION 2168 OF TITLE 53 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 2168. Automatic certification.* * *(f) Fort Indiantown Gap police officer certification.--An 20250SB0327PN1360 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 installation police officer at Fort Indiantown Gap under 51 Pa.C.S. § 711 (relating to i nstallation of police officers for Fort Indiantown Gap and other designated Commonwealth military installations and facilities) shall be eligible to maintain certification if the installation police officer meets the following:(1) Satisfactorily completed the basic educational and training requirements established under this subchapter.(2) Satisfactorily completed the minimum number of in-service training hours established by the commission and required to maintain certification.(3) Either:(i) has an active certification on or after the effective date of this subsection; or(ii) was previously certified as a police officer by the commission, which certification lapsed within the last two years, and has been employed, with no lapse in service, as an installation police officer at Fort Indiantown Gap.SECTION 4. A RESOLUTION ADOPTED BY A COUNCIL OF TRUSTEES OF AN INSTITUTION WITHIN THE STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION UNDER SECTION 2009-A(A)(13) OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, THAT AUTHORIZES CAMPUS POLICE TO CARRY FIREARMS SHALL BE VOID AND OF NO EFFECT AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 2 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0327PN1360 - 3 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526